Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska32-503
United States Representatives in Congress; terms; qualifications; partisan ballot.

The United States Representatives in Congress shall be elected from the three congressional districts established in section 32-504 for terms of two years at the statewide general election in each even-numbered year. Candidates for the United States House of Representatives shall meet the qualifications found in Article I, section 2, of the Constitution of the United States. The representatives shall be elected on the partisan ballot. The representatives shall be elected in accordance with the laws of the United States.

Laws 1994, LB 76, § 99.

Cited but not discussed. Exon v. Tiemann, 279 F.Supp. 609 (D. Neb. 1968).